extensions/331662_correutor_asturianu/correutor_asturianu-2.70/dictionaries/ast.dic
abaullar/VdVvVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
abaunar/VdVvVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
absolver/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
acarrellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
acertar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
acopellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
acorrer/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
acoyer/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
adentellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
adquirir/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
afacer/VbVkVpVrVtGa
afogar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
aforzar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
agavellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
ainar/VdVvVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
aislar/VdVvVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
albortar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
alcordar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
alluir/VdVvVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
almorzar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
alporcar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
alvertir/VbVfViVjVkVmVqVrVtGa
amagostar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
amainar/VdVvVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
amartellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
amoblar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
amorgar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
amosar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
anaupar/VdVvVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
anovar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
anteponer/VbVkVpVrVtGa
anzolar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
apegar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
apertar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
aportar/VaVbVeVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
aposentar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
apostellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
argadellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
arrecender/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
arrendar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
arrestellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
arrevolar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
arromper/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
asconder/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
asollar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
astener/VbVkVpVrVtGa
atender/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
atestar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
atrapellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
atrubecar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
auchar/VdVvVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
aullar/VdVvVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
aunir/VdVvVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
auñar/VdVvVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
avergonzar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
azogar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
azurdellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
calentar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
camentar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
carabellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
castañolar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
cegar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
cocer/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
cohibir/VdVvVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
collar/SmNmYsVbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
competir/VcVgViVjVkVnVqVrVt
componer/VbVkVpVrVt
comprobar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
confesar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
consentir/VbVfViVjVkVnVqVrVt
contar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
contraponer/VbVkVpVrVt
convertir/VbVfViVjVkVmVqVrVt
corresponder/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
correxir/VcVgViVjVkVnVqVrVt
coser/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
coyer/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
decoyer/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
deponer/VbVkVpVrVt
derromper/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desamestar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desamorgar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desaponer/VbVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desarropellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desatorcar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desaunir/VdVvVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
descaltener/VbVkVpVrVt
descolgar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desconcertar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
descontar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
descoser/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desempoyar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desencoyer/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desengavellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desenllamorgar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desenraizar/VdVvVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desenrestrar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desenterrar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desenvolver/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desfacer/VbVkVpVrVt
desferver/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desheredar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desorellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
despesllar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
despoblar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desrabadellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
destorcer/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desvergonzar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
detener/VbVkVpVrVt
dexoncer/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
disonar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
dixerir/VbVfViVjVkVmVqVrVt
dormir/VbVfViVjVkVnVqVrVt
empedrar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
empezar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
emponer/VbVkVpVrVtGa
empostellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
emprecontar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
encamentar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
encibellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
encolmar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
encontrar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
encoyer/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
encubertar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
enfogar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
engarabellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
engavellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
engorropellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
engrescar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
enllozar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
enraizar/VdVvVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
enredar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
enrobellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
enropellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
entainar/VdVvVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
entecoyer/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
enterrar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
entoyer/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
entrecocer/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
entrever/VbVfVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
envolcar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
escalentar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
escapellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
escartafoyar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
escazobellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
escolásticu/AaMaApAsAqGaYsVbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
escollar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
escomenzar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esconder/SmNmGaYsVbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
escordar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
escorrer/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
escostellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
escudellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esfollar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esgarfellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esgobernar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esmelgar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esmoler/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esmorcellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esosar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esperder/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esportellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esregar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esterrar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
feder/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
ferrar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
ferver/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
forar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
foyar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
gavellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
goler/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
guiar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
imponer/VbVkVpVrVtGa
interponer/VbVkVpVrVtGa
invertir/VbVfViVjVkVmVqVrVtGa
llabegar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
llaregar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
malfacer/VbVkVpVrVt
mantener/VbVkVpVrVt
marmellar/SmNmYsVbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
martellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
merendar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
morder/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
mostrar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
moyar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
negar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
oponer/VbVkVpVrVtGa
oir/XxVdVjVkVoVrVt st:oyer
percollar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
perder/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
pervertir/VbVfViVjVkVmVqVrVt
plegar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
poder/SmNmYsVbVfVhVkVqVrVt
posponer/VbVkVpVrVt
predisponer/VbVkVpVrVt
prender/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
presuponer/VbVkVpVrVt
prever/VbVfVjVkVmVpVrVt
promover/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
provenir/VbVkVqVrVt
rabadellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
rastrellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
recalentar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
recomponer/VbVkVpVrVt
reconvertir/VbVfViVjVkVmVqVrVt
recoser/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
recoyer/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
referir/VbVfViVjVkVmVqVrVt
referver/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
refollar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
regar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
remorder/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
remoyar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
renovar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
repetir/VcVgViVjVkVnVqVrVt
repolgar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
repoyar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
rescocer/SmNmYsVbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
resgar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
resolver/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
responder/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
restorcer/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
retener/VbVkVpVrVt
revender/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
reventar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
revoltar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
rexir/VcVgViVjVkVnVqVrVt
rogar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
saponer/VbVkVpVrVt
sentir/VbVfViVjVkVnVqVrVt
sobrevolar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
sollar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
sorber/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
soterrar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
tarabellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
tener/VbVkVpVrVt
torcer/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
travesar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
trescordar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
tresvertir/VbVfViVjVkVmVqVrVt
unviar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
vergonzar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
volar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
xugar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
